Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 275.07, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. School district levies; special requirements. (a) In school districts lying in more than one county, the clerk shall certify the tax levied to the auditor of the county in which the administrative offices of the school district are located. (b) The district must identify the portion of the school district levy that is levied for debt service at the time the levy is certified under this section. deleted text begin For the purposes of this paragraph, "levied for debt service" meansdeleted text end new text begin The portion equals: (1) thenew text end levies authorized under sections 123B.53, 123B.535, and 123B.55, as adjusted by sections 126C.46 and 126C.48, net of any debt excess levy reductions under section 475.61, subdivision 4, excluding debt service amounts necessary for repayment of other postemployment benefits under section 475.52, subdivision 6new text begin ; and (2) the levy authorized under section 126C.40 that is assessed and certified by a cooperative unit to the district as the district's proportionate share attributable to debt issued by the cooperative unitnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with taxes payable in 2027 and thereafter. new text end